Illinois, session 104th, SB522.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Entities Single-Use Plastic Reporting 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 567/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the State 8Entities Single-Use Plastic Reporting Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-470, eff. 8-4-23.)